Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2127
Bonds; sale.

The bonds may be sold by the authority in such manner and for such price as the authority may determine, at par or above par, at private sale or at public sale after notice published prior to such sale in a legal newspaper having general circulation in the municipality, or in such other medium of publication as the authority may deem appropriate, or may be exchanged by the authority for other bonds issued by it under the Community Development Law. Bonds which are issued under this section may be sold by the authority to the federal government at private sale at par or above par, and, in the event that less than all of the authorized principal amount of such bonds is sold by the authority to the federal government, the balance or any portion of the balance may be sold by the authority at private sale at par or above par.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 10(4), p. 812;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1627;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2627;

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 22.